Colorado, session 2026A, HB1304.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) In 1980, the state historical society, also known as history
Colorado, was deeded mineral rights and a nonparticipating royalty interest
on various parcels in Weld County, referred to as the Weld County rights.
The Weld County rights were donated to history Colorado through the
estate of Eleanor Bein.
(b) In 2012, history Colorado was deeded mineral rights on various
parcels in West Virginia, referred to as the West Virginia rights, which were
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

mistakenly recorded as belonging to St. Elizabeth's Retreat Chapel. In 2024,
an oil and natural gas company contacted history Colorado to relay the
mistaken recording of mineral rights.
(c) History Colorado has determined that the intent of the donors of
the Weld County rights and the West Virginia rights are best served by
selling the rights. Given the current market interest in the rights, history
Colorado has determined that a sale would be most financially beneficial for
history Colorado in the near term. A sale would also alleviate history
Colorado from administrative obligations associated with the rights.
SECTION 2. History Colorado authority to dispose of real
property.
(1) The state of Colorado, acting by and through the state historical
society, also known as history Colorado, is authorized to dispose of mineral
rights and nonparticipating royalty interests associated with the following
properties:
(a) Section 28, Township 4 north, range 68 west, 6th Principal
Meridian, Weld County, Colorado; and
(b) West Virginia property formerly associated with St. Elizabeth's
Retreat Chapel.
(2) The state controller must approve all agreements relating to the
disposition described in subsection (1) of this section prior to closing.
History Colorado shall provide an update on the disposition of mineral
rights and nonparticipating royalty interests to the capital development
committee.
(3) History Colorado shall credit the proceeds of the disposition
described in subsection (1) of this section to the state museum cash fund
created in section 24-80-214 to be used for a strategic investment in capital
improvements, including the retrofitting of the collections care facility and
controlled maintenance.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1304

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1304